Massachusetts, session 194th, H175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of Chapter 94G of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by
adding a new subsection - :
(i) A marijuana establishment may create retail drive-up curbside pickup for the sale of
medical and recreational marijuana, including but not limited to both external and internal
curbside pickup. The establishment must seek approval from the town or city where the
establishment is located. The establishment’s drive-up curbside pickup must be in compliance
with all town or city ordinances regulating drive-up curbside pickup.
of 1